North Carolina statutes. Constitution of North Carolina
Article VIII Corporations

§ 1. Corporate charters.

No corporation shall be created, nor shall its charter be extended, altered, or amended by special act, except corporations for charitable, educational, penal, or reformatory purposes that are to be and remain under the patronage and control of the State; but the General Assembly shall provide by general laws for the chartering, organization, and powers of all corporations, and for the amending, extending, and forfeiture of all charters, except those above permitted by special act. All such general acts may be altered from time to time or repealed. The General Assembly may at any time by special act repeal the charter of any corporation.

History.

1969, c. 1258, s. 1.

History Note.

The provisions of this section are similar to those of Art. VIII, § 1, Const. 1868, as amended in 1916.

Legal Periodicals.

See 12 N.C.L. Rev. 296 (1934).

For article on local legislation in the General Assembly, discussing this section, see 45 N.C.L. Rev. 340 (1967).

For a comment on the acquisition, abandonment, and preservation of rail corridors in North Carolina, see 75 N.C.L. Rev. 1989 (1997).

§ 2. Corporations defined.

The term “corporation” as used in this Section shall be construed to include all associations and joint-stock companies having any of the powers and privileges of corporations not possessed by individuals or partnerships. All corporations shall have the right to sue and shall be subject to be sued in all courts, in like cases as natural persons.

History.

1969, c. 1258, s. 1.

History Note.

The provisions of this section are similar to those of Art. VIII, § 3, Const. 1868, as amended in 1916.